Illinois, session 104th, HB1330.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5changing Section 4.02 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/4.02)7    Sec. 4.02. Community Care Program. The Department shall 8establish a program of services to prevent unnecessary 9institutionalization of persons age 60 and older in need of 10long term care or who are established as persons who suffer 11from Alzheimer's disease or a related disorder under the 12Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act, thereby enabling them to 13remain in their own homes or in other living arrangements. 14Such preventive services, which may be coordinated with other 15programs for the aged, may include, but are not limited to, any 16or all of the following:17        (a) (blank);18        (b) (blank);19        (c) home care aide services;20        (d) personal assistant services;21        (e) adult day services;22        (f) home-delivered meals;23        (g) education in self-care;  HB1330- 2 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1        (h) personal care services;2        (i) adult day health services;3        (j) habilitation services;4        (k) respite care;5        (k-5) community reintegration services; 6        (k-6) flexible senior services;7        (k-7) medication management;8        (k-8) emergency home response; 9        (l) other nonmedical social services that may enable 10    the person to become self-supporting; or11        (m) (blank).12    The Department shall establish eligibility standards for 13such services. In determining the amount and nature of 14services for which a person may qualify, consideration shall 15not be given to the value of cash, property, or other assets 16held in the name of the person's spouse pursuant to a written 17agreement dividing marital property into equal but separate 18shares or pursuant to a transfer of the person's interest in a 19home to his spouse, provided that the spouse's share of the 20marital property is not made available to the person seeking 21such services.22    The Department shall require as a condition of eligibility 23that all new financially eligible applicants apply for and 24enroll in medical assistance under Article V of the Illinois 25Public Aid Code in accordance with rules promulgated by the 26Department.   HB1330- 3 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1    The Department shall, in conjunction with the Department 2of Public Aid (now Department of Healthcare and Family 3Services), seek appropriate amendments under Sections 1915 and 41924 of the Social Security Act. The purpose of the amendments 5shall be to extend eligibility for home and community based 6services under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the Social Security 7Act to persons who transfer to or for the benefit of a spouse 8those amounts of income and resources allowed under Section 91924 of the Social Security Act. Subject to the approval of 10such amendments, the Department shall extend the provisions of 11Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid Code to persons who, but 12for the provision of home or community-based services, would 13require the level of care provided in an institution, as is 14provided for in federal law. Those persons no longer found to 15be eligible for receiving noninstitutional services due to 16changes in the eligibility criteria shall be given 45 days 17notice prior to actual termination. Those persons receiving 18notice of termination may contact the Department and request 19the determination be appealed at any time during the 45 day 20notice period. The target population identified for the 21purposes of this Section are persons age 60 and older with an 22identified service need. Priority shall be given to those who 23are at imminent risk of institutionalization. The services 24shall be provided to eligible persons age 60 and older to the 25extent that the cost of the services together with the other 26personal maintenance expenses of the persons are reasonably   HB1330- 4 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1related to the standards established for care in a group 2facility appropriate to the person's condition. These 3noninstitutional non-institutional services, pilot projects, 4or experimental facilities may be provided as part of or in 5addition to those authorized by federal law or those funded 6and administered by the Department of Human Services. The 7Departments of Human Services, Healthcare and Family Services, 8Public Health, Veterans' Affairs, and Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity and other appropriate agencies of State, federal, 10and local governments shall cooperate with the Department on 11Aging in the establishment and development of the 12noninstitutional non-institutional services. The Department 13shall require an annual audit from all personal assistant and 14home care aide vendors contracting with the Department under 15this Section. The annual audit shall assure that each audited 16vendor's procedures are in compliance with Department's 17financial reporting guidelines requiring an administrative and 18employee wage and benefits cost split as defined in 19administrative rules. The audit is a public record under the 20Freedom of Information Act. The Department shall execute, 21relative to the nursing home prescreening project, written 22inter-agency agreements with the Department of Human Services 23and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, to 24effect the following: (1) intake procedures and common 25eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 26noninstitutional non-institutional services; and (2) the   HB1330- 5 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1establishment and development of noninstitutional 2non-institutional services in areas of the State where they 3are not currently available or are undeveloped. On and after 4July 1, 1996, all nursing home prescreenings for individuals 560 years of age or older shall be conducted by the Department.6    As part of the Department on Aging's routine training of 7case managers and case manager supervisors, the Department may 8include information on family futures planning for persons who 9are age 60 or older and who are caregivers of their adult 10children with developmental disabilities. The content of the 11training shall be at the Department's discretion.12    The Department is authorized to establish a system of 13recipient copayment for services provided under this Section, 14such copayment to be based upon the recipient's ability to pay 15but in no case to exceed the actual cost of the services 16provided. Additionally, any portion of a person's income which 17is equal to or less than the federal poverty standard shall not 18be considered by the Department in determining the copayment. 19The level of such copayment shall be adjusted whenever 20necessary to reflect any change in the officially designated 21federal poverty standard.22    The Department, or the Department's authorized 23representative, may recover the amount of moneys expended for 24services provided to or in behalf of a person under this 25Section by a claim against the person's estate or against the 26estate of the person's surviving spouse, but no recovery may   HB1330- 6 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1be had until after the death of the surviving spouse, if any, 2and then only at such time when there is no surviving child who 3is under age 21 or blind or who has a permanent and total 4disability. This paragraph, however, shall not bar recovery, 5at the death of the person, of moneys for services provided to 6the person or in behalf of the person under this Section to 7which the person was not entitled; provided that such recovery 8shall not be enforced against any real estate while it is 9occupied as a homestead by the surviving spouse or other 10dependent, if no claims by other creditors have been filed 11against the estate, or, if such claims have been filed, they 12remain dormant for failure of prosecution or failure of the 13claimant to compel administration of the estate for the 14purpose of payment. This paragraph shall not bar recovery from 15the estate of a spouse, under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the 16Social Security Act and Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid 17Code, who precedes a person receiving services under this 18Section in death. All moneys for services paid to or in behalf 19of the person under this Section shall be claimed for recovery 20from the deceased spouse's estate. "Homestead", as used in 21this paragraph, means the dwelling house and contiguous real 22estate occupied by a surviving spouse or relative, as defined 23by the rules and regulations of the Department of Healthcare 24and Family Services, regardless of the value of the property.25    The Department shall increase the effectiveness of the 26existing Community Care Program by:  HB1330- 7 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1        (1) ensuring that in-home services included in the 2    care plan are available on evenings and weekends;3        (2) ensuring that care plans contain the services that 4    eligible participants need based on the number of days in 5    a month, not limited to specific blocks of time, as 6    identified by the comprehensive assessment tool selected 7    by the Department for use statewide, not to exceed the 8    total monthly service cost maximum allowed for each 9    service; the Department shall develop administrative rules 10    to implement this item (2);11        (3) ensuring that the participants have the right to 12    choose the services contained in their care plan and to 13    direct how those services are provided, based on 14    administrative rules established by the Department;15        (4)(blank);16        (5) ensuring that homemakers can provide personal care 17    services that may or may not involve contact with clients, 18    including, but not limited to:19            (A) bathing;20            (B) grooming;21            (C) toileting;22            (D) nail care;23            (E) transferring;24            (F) respiratory services;25            (G) exercise; or26            (H) positioning;  HB1330- 8 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1        (6) ensuring that homemaker program vendors are not 2    restricted from hiring homemakers who are family members 3    of clients or recommended by clients; the Department may 4    not, by rule or policy, require homemakers who are family 5    members of clients or recommended by clients to accept 6    assignments in homes other than the client;7        (7) ensuring that the State may access maximum federal 8    matching funds by seeking approval for the Centers for 9    Medicare and Medicaid Services for modifications to the 10    State's home and community based services waiver and 11    additional waiver opportunities, including applying for 12    enrollment in the Balance Incentive Payment Program by May 13    1, 2013, in order to maximize federal matching funds; this 14    shall include, but not be limited to, modification that 15    reflects all changes in the Community Care Program 16    services and all increases in the services cost maximum;17        (8) ensuring that the determination of need tool 18    accurately reflects the service needs of individuals with 19    Alzheimer's disease and related dementia disorders; 20        (9) ensuring that services are authorized accurately 21    and consistently for the Community Care Program (CCP); the 22    Department shall implement a Service Authorization policy 23    directive; the purpose shall be to ensure that eligibility 24    and services are authorized accurately and consistently in 25    the CCP program; the policy directive shall clarify 26    service authorization guidelines to Care Coordination   HB1330- 9 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1    Units and Community Care Program providers no later than 2    May 1, 2013;3        (10) working in conjunction with Care Coordination 4    Units, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 5    the Department of Human Services, Community Care Program 6    providers, and other stakeholders to make improvements to 7    the Medicaid claiming processes and the Medicaid 8    enrollment procedures or requirements as needed, 9    including, but not limited to, specific policy changes or 10    rules to improve the up-front enrollment of participants 11    in the Medicaid program and specific policy changes or 12    rules to insure more prompt submission of bills to the 13    federal government to secure maximum federal matching 14    dollars as promptly as possible; the Department on Aging 15    shall have at least 3 meetings with stakeholders by 16    January 1, 2014 in order to address these improvements;17        (11) requiring home care service providers to comply 18    with the rounding of hours worked provisions under the 19    federal Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) and as set forth 20    in 29 CFR 785.48(b) by May 1, 2013;21        (12) implementing any necessary policy changes or 22    promulgating any rules, no later than January 1, 2014, to 23    assist the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 24    moving as many participants as possible, consistent with 25    federal regulations, into coordinated care plans if a care 26    coordination plan that covers long term care is available   HB1330- 10 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1    in the recipient's area; and 2        (13) (blank).3    By January 1, 2009 or as soon after the end of the Cash and 4Counseling Demonstration Project as is practicable, the 5Department may, based on its evaluation of the demonstration 6project, promulgate rules concerning personal assistant 7services, to include, but need not be limited to, 8qualifications, employment screening, rights under fair labor 9standards, training, fiduciary agent, and supervision 10requirements. All applicants shall be subject to the 11provisions of the Health Care Worker Background Check Act. 12    The Department shall develop procedures to enhance 13availability of services on evenings, weekends, and on an 14emergency basis to meet the respite needs of caregivers. 15Procedures shall be developed to permit the utilization of 16services in successive blocks of 24 hours up to the monthly 17maximum established by the Department. Workers providing these 18services shall be appropriately trained.19    No September 23, 1991 (Public Act 87-729) person may 20perform chore/housekeeping and home care aide services under a 21program authorized by this Section unless that person has been 22issued a certificate of pre-service to do so by his or her 23employing agency. Information gathered to effect such 24certification shall include (i) the person's name, (ii) the 25date the person was hired by his or her current employer, and 26(iii) the training, including dates and levels. Persons   HB1330- 11 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1engaged in the program authorized by this Section before the 2effective date of this amendatory Act of 1991 shall be issued a 3certificate of all pre-service and in-service training from 4his or her employer upon submitting the necessary information. 5The employing agency shall be required to retain records of 6all staff pre-service and in-service training, and shall 7provide such records to the Department upon request and upon 8termination of the employer's contract with the Department. In 9addition, the employing agency is responsible for the issuance 10of certifications of in-service training completed to their 11employees.12    The Department is required to develop a system to ensure 13that persons working as home care aides and personal 14assistants receive increases in their wages when the federal 15minimum wage is increased by requiring vendors to certify that 16they are meeting the federal minimum wage statute for home 17care aides and personal assistants. An employer that cannot 18ensure that the minimum wage increase is being given to home 19care aides and personal assistants shall be denied any 20increase in reimbursement costs.21    The Community Care Program Advisory Committee is created 22in the Department on Aging. The Director shall appoint 23individuals to serve in the Committee, who shall serve at 24their own expense. Members of the Committee must abide by all 25applicable ethics laws. The Committee shall advise the 26Department on issues related to the Department's program of   HB1330- 12 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1services to prevent unnecessary institutionalization. The 2Committee shall meet on a bi-monthly basis and shall serve to 3identify and advise the Department on present and potential 4issues affecting the service delivery network, the program's 5clients, and the Department and to recommend solution 6strategies. Persons appointed to the Committee shall be 7appointed on, but not limited to, their own and their agency's 8experience with the program, geographic representation, and 9willingness to serve. The Director shall appoint members to 10the Committee to represent provider, advocacy, policy 11research, and other constituencies committed to the delivery 12of high quality home and community-based services to older 13adults. Representatives shall be appointed to ensure 14representation from community care providers, including, but 15not limited to, adult day service providers, homemaker 16providers, case coordination and case management units, 17emergency home response providers, statewide trade or labor 18unions that represent home care aides and direct care staff, 19area agencies on aging, adults over age 60, membership 20organizations representing older adults, and other 21organizational entities, providers of care, or individuals 22with demonstrated interest and expertise in the field of home 23and community care as determined by the Director.24    Nominations may be presented from any agency or State 25association with interest in the program. The Director, or his 26or her designee, shall serve as the permanent co-chair of the   HB1330- 13 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1advisory committee. One other co-chair shall be nominated and 2approved by the members of the committee on an annual basis. 3Committee members' terms of appointment shall be for 4 years 4with one-quarter of the appointees' terms expiring each year. 5A member shall continue to serve until his or her replacement 6is named. The Department shall fill vacancies that have a 7remaining term of over one year, and this replacement shall 8occur through the annual replacement of expiring terms. The 9Director shall designate Department staff to provide technical 10assistance and staff support to the committee. Department 11representation shall not constitute membership of the 12committee. All Committee papers, issues, recommendations, 13reports, and meeting memoranda are advisory only. The 14Director, or his or her designee, shall make a written report, 15as requested by the Committee, regarding issues before the 16Committee. 17    The Department on Aging and the Department of Human 18Services shall cooperate in the development and submission of 19an annual report on programs and services provided under this 20Section. Such joint report shall be filed with the Governor 21and the General Assembly on or before March 31 of the following 22fiscal year.23    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 24shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 25by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act and 26filing such additional copies with the State Government Report   HB1330- 14 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 2under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.3    Those persons previously found eligible for receiving 4noninstitutional non-institutional services whose services 5were discontinued under the Emergency Budget Act of Fiscal 6Year 1992, and who do not meet the eligibility standards in 7effect on or after July 1, 1992, shall remain ineligible on and 8after July 1, 1992. Those persons previously not required to 9cost-share and who were required to cost-share effective March 101, 1992, shall continue to meet cost-share requirements on and 11after July 1, 1992. Beginning July 1, 1992, all clients will be 12required to meet eligibility, cost-share, and other 13requirements and will have services discontinued or altered 14when they fail to meet these requirements.15    For the purposes of this Section, "flexible senior 16services" refers to services that require one-time or periodic 17expenditures, including, but not limited to, respite care, 18home modification, assistive technology, housing assistance, 19and transportation. 20    The Department shall implement an electronic service 21verification based on global positioning systems or other 22cost-effective technology for the Community Care Program no 23later than January 1, 2014. 24    The Department shall require, as a condition of 25eligibility, application for the medical assistance program 26under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code.   HB1330- 15 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1    The Department may authorize Community Care Program 2services until an applicant is determined eligible for medical 3assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 4    The Department shall continue to provide Community Care 5Program reports as required by statute, which shall include an 6annual report on Care Coordination Unit performance and 7adherence to service guidelines and a 6-month supplemental 8report. 9    In regard to community care providers, failure to comply 10with Department on Aging policies shall be cause for 11disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, 12disqualification from serving Community Care Program clients. 13Each provider, upon submission of any bill or invoice to the 14Department for payment for services rendered, shall include a 15notarized statement, under penalty of perjury pursuant to 16Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that the 17provider has complied with all Department policies. 18    The Director of the Department on Aging shall make 19information available to the State Board of Elections as may 20be required by an agreement the State Board of Elections has 21entered into with a multi-state voter registration list 22maintenance system. 23    The Department shall pay an enhanced rate of at least 24$1.77 per unit under the Community Care Program to those 25in-home service provider agencies that offer health insurance 26coverage as a benefit to their direct service worker employees   HB1330- 16 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1pursuant to rules adopted by the Department. The Department 2shall review the enhanced rate as part of its process to rebase 3in-home service provider reimbursement rates pursuant to 4federal waiver requirements. Subject to federal approval, 5beginning on January 1, 2024, rates for adult day services 6shall be increased to $16.84 per hour and rates for each way 7transportation services for adult day services shall be 8increased to $12.44 per unit transportation. 9    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2024, 10rates for homemaker services shall be increased to $28.07 to 11sustain a minimum wage of $17 per hour for direct service 12workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall be no 13lower than the rates put into effect upon federal approval. 14Providers of in-home services shall be required to certify to 15the Department that they remain in compliance with the 16mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 17benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 18payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 19transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 20increases described in this paragraph. 21    Subject to and upon federal approval, on and after January 221, 2025, rates for homemaker services shall be increased to 23$29.63 to sustain a minimum wage of $18 per hour for direct 24service workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall 25be no lower than the rates put into effect upon federal 26approval. Providers of in-home services shall be required to   HB1330- 17 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1certify to the Department that they remain in compliance with 2the mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 3benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 4payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 5transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 6increases described in this paragraph. 7    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2026, 8rates for in-home services shall be increased to $32.75 to 9sustain a minimum wage of $20 per hour for direct service 10workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall be no 11lower than the rates put into effect upon federal approval. In 12order for a provider of in-home services to be eligible to 13receive the $32.75 rate, the provider must pay a minimum wage 14of $20 per hour to all direct service workers employed by the 15provider. Providers of in-home services shall be required to 16certify to the Department that they remain in compliance with 17the mandated wage increase for direct service workers. By no 18more than 60 days after issuing notification of the rate 19increase, the Department shall require providers of in-home 20services to submit such certification to the Department in 21order for the provider to be eligible for the $32.75 rate for 22in-home services. The Department shall also require each 23provider of in-home services to submit cost reports to the 24Department consistent with Section 240.2023 of Title 89 of the 25Illinois Administrative Code in order for the provider to be 26eligible for the $32.75 rate for in-home services. Fringe   HB1330- 18 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 2payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 3transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 4increases described in this paragraph.5    To ensure that in-home service payment rates are adequate 6to maintain a sufficient direct care workforce to meet the 7needs of Community Care Program beneficiaries and provide 8access to services in the amount, duration, and scope 9specified in beneficiaries' person-centered service plans, 10beginning January 1, 2028, the Department shall ensure that 11each in-home service provider spends a minimum of 80% of total 12payments the provider receives for homecare aide services it 13furnishes under the Community Care Program on total 14compensation for direct service workers who furnish those 15services. "Compensation" means salary, wages, and other 16remuneration as defined by the Fair Labor Standards Act and 17implementing regulations (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., 29 CFR Parts 18531 and 778); benefits (such as health and dental benefits, 19life and disability insurance, paid leave, retirement, and 20tuition reimbursement); and the employer share of payroll 21taxes for direct service workers delivering services 22authorized under this Section. This calculation shall not 23include excluded costs as defined in this paragraph. The 24Department shall require each provider annually to submit a 25direct service worker cost report certifying that the provider 26has met the minimum spending requirement. The report must be   HB1330- 19 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1based upon actual, documented expenditures, attested to by an 2authorized representative of the provider, and submitted 3within 6 months after the end of the reporting period. The 4Department shall adopt rules amending current rules on 5financial reporting and minimum direct service worker costs to 6implement this paragraph. If a provider fails to meet the 7requirements of this paragraph, the Department may sanction 8the provider by closing intake of Community Care Program 9participants on some or all of the provider's contracts for a 10period of time, or by terminating some or all of the provider's 11contracts under the Community Care Program. For purposes of 12this paragraph, "excluded costs" mean costs of administering 13required trainings for direct service workers (such as costs 14for qualified trainers and training materials); travel costs 15for direct service workers (such as mileage reimbursement or 16public transportation subsidies); costs of personal protective 17equipment for direct service workers; and the cost of health 18insurance coverage for direct service workers not exceeding 19the value of an enhanced rate paid under the Community Care 20Program to in-home service provider agencies that offer health 21insurance coverage as a benefit to direct service workers 22consistent with the mandates of Public Act 95-713. 23    The General Assembly finds it necessary to authorize an 24aggressive Medicaid enrollment initiative designed to maximize 25federal Medicaid funding for the Community Care Program which 26produces significant savings for the State of Illinois. The   HB1330- 20 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1Department on Aging shall establish and implement a Community 2Care Program Medicaid Initiative. Under the Initiative, the 3Department on Aging shall, at a minimum: (i) provide an 4enhanced rate to adequately compensate care coordination units 5to enroll eligible Community Care Program clients into 6Medicaid; (ii) use recommendations from a stakeholder 7committee on how best to implement the Initiative; and (iii) 8establish requirements for State agencies to make enrollment 9in the State's Medical Assistance program easier for seniors. 10    The Community Care Program Medicaid Enrollment Oversight 11Subcommittee is created as a subcommittee of the Older Adult 12Services Advisory Committee established in Section 35 of the 13Older Adult Services Act to make recommendations on how best 14to increase the number of medical assistance recipients who 15are enrolled in the Community Care Program. The Subcommittee 16shall consist of all of the following persons who must be 17appointed within 30 days after June 4, 2018 (the effective 18date of Public Act 100-587): 19        (1) The Director of Aging, or his or her designee, who 20    shall serve as the chairperson of the Subcommittee. 21        (2) One representative of the Department of Healthcare 22    and Family Services, appointed by the Director of 23    Healthcare and Family Services. 24        (3) One representative of the Department of Human 25    Services, appointed by the Secretary of Human Services. 26        (4) One individual representing a care coordination   HB1330- 21 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1    unit, appointed by the Director of Aging. 2        (5) One individual from a non-governmental statewide 3    organization that advocates for seniors, appointed by the 4    Director of Aging. 5        (6) One individual representing Area Agencies on 6    Aging, appointed by the Director of Aging. 7        (7) One individual from a statewide association 8    dedicated to Alzheimer's care, support, and research, 9    appointed by the Director of Aging. 10        (8) One individual from an organization that employs 11    persons who provide services under the Community Care 12    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 13        (9) One member of a trade or labor union representing 14    persons who provide services under the Community Care 15    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 16        (10) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 17    co-chairperson, appointed by the President of the Senate. 18        (11) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 19    co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority Leader of the 20    Senate. 21        (12) One member of the House of Representatives, who 22    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Speaker of 23    the House of Representatives. 24        (13) One member of the House of Representatives, who 25    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority 26    Leader of the House of Representatives.   HB1330- 22 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1        (14) One individual appointed by a labor organization 2    representing frontline employees at the Department of 3    Human Services. 4    The Subcommittee shall provide oversight to the Community 5Care Program Medicaid Initiative and shall meet quarterly. At 6each Subcommittee meeting the Department on Aging shall 7provide the following data sets to the Subcommittee: (A) the 8number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 9service area, who are receiving services under the Community 10Care Program and are enrolled in the State's Medical 11Assistance Program; (B) the number of Illinois residents, 12categorized by planning and service area, who are receiving 13services under the Community Care Program, but are not 14enrolled in the State's Medical Assistance Program; and (C) 15the number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 16service area, who are receiving services under the Community 17Care Program and are eligible for benefits under the State's 18Medical Assistance Program, but are not enrolled in the 19State's Medical Assistance Program. In addition to this data, 20the Department on Aging shall provide the Subcommittee with 21plans on how the Department on Aging will reduce the number of 22Illinois residents who are not enrolled in the State's Medical 23Assistance Program but who are eligible for medical assistance 24benefits. The Department on Aging shall enroll in the State's 25Medical Assistance Program those Illinois residents who 26receive services under the Community Care Program and are   HB1330- 23 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1eligible for medical assistance benefits but are not enrolled 2in the State's Medicaid Assistance Program. The data provided 3to the Subcommittee shall be made available to the public via 4the Department on Aging's website. 5    The Department on Aging, with the involvement of the 6Subcommittee, shall collaborate with the Department of Human 7Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 8on how best to achieve the responsibilities of the Community 9Care Program Medicaid Initiative. 10    The Department on Aging, the Department of Human Services, 11and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 12coordinate and implement a streamlined process for seniors to 13access benefits under the State's Medical Assistance Program. 14    The Subcommittee shall collaborate with the Department of 15Human Services on the adoption of a uniform application 16submission process. The Department of Human Services and any 17other State agency involved with processing the medical 18assistance application of any person enrolled in the Community 19Care Program shall include the appropriate care coordination 20unit in all communications related to the determination or 21status of the application. 22    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall 23provide targeted funding to care coordination units to help 24seniors complete their applications for medical assistance 25benefits. On and after July 1, 2019, care coordination units 26shall receive no less than $200 per completed application,   HB1330- 24 -LRB104 06107 KTG 16140 b1which rate may be included in a bundled rate for initial intake 2services when Medicaid application assistance is provided in 3conjunction with the initial intake process for new program 4participants.5    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall cease 6operation 5 years after June 4, 2018 (the effective date of 7Public Act 100-587), after which the Subcommittee shall 8dissolve. 9    Effective July 1, 2023, subject to federal approval, the 10Department on Aging shall reimburse Care Coordination Units at 11the following rates for case management services: $252.40 for 12each initial assessment; $366.40 for each initial assessment 13with translation; $229.68 for each redetermination assessment; 14$313.68 for each redetermination assessment with translation; 15$200.00 for each completed application for medical assistance 16benefits; $132.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 17screening; $168.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 18screening with translation; $124.56 for each 6-month, 19face-to-face visit; $132.00 for each MCO participant 20eligibility determination; and $157.00 for each MCO 21participant eligibility determination with translation. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 23103-102, Article 45, Section 45-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, 24Article 85, Section 85-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 90, 25Section 90-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 267-1-24; 103-670, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)